Georgia, session 2025_26, HB468.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act providing for the Heard County Board of Education, approved March 28, 1985
(Ga. L. 1985, p. 5078), as amended, particularly by an Act approved May 3, 2018 (Ga. L.
2018, p. 3613), is amended by revising Section 6 as follows:
"SECTION 6.
Each member of the board shall receive $450.00 per month as compensation for his or her
services. While meeting or traveling outside Heard County as a member of the board, the
chairperson or any member of the board shall receive reimbursement for actual expenses
necessarily incurred in connection therewith. To be eligible for reimbursement, travel must
H. B. 468
- 1 -

LC 47 3167/AP
first be authorized by a majority vote of the board and may be for, but is not limited to,
attending training sessions or state-wide meetings. All expenses shall be verified and
approved prior to reimbursement in such manner as may be specified by the board.
Compensation and reimbursement of board members shall be payable from the funds of
the board."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 468
- 2 -